Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 50
STATE COLLEGES - GENERAL PROVISIONS

23-50-101 to 23-50-115. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article repealed, p. 775, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 5 of chapter 124, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2003, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.